Hawaii statutes.
[§354D-7] Pricing. (a) The
administrator, with the approval of the director, shall determine the prices at
which all goods and services produced are sold. The prices shall be as near to
the prevailing market prices for similar goods and services as practicable.

(b) The administrator shall prepare catalogs
containing the description of all goods and services produced with the price of
each item. Copies of the catalogs shall be made available to the State, the
counties, and the federal government.

(c) The administrator shall ensure that the
quality of goods and services produced is comparable to similar goods and
services available from the private sector. For sales to the State or the
counties, the quality of the goods or services shall be consistent with the
specifications for the goods or services requested. [L 1990, c 341, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next